Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201771-520
Food supplement and treatment services program; authorized; fees.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall establish a program to provide food supplements and treatment services to individuals suffering from the inherited or congenital infant or childhood-onset diseases set forth in section 71-519. To defray or help defray the costs of any program which may be established by the department under this section, the department may prescribe and assess a scale of fees for the food supplements. The maximum prescribed fee for food supplements shall be no more than the actual cost of providing such supplements. No fees may be charged for formula, and up to two thousand dollars of pharmaceutically manufactured food supplements shall be available to an individual without fees each year. For purposes of this section, pharmaceutically manufactured foods are chemically synthesized or processed for the treatment of inborn errors in metabolism.

Laws 1987, LB 385, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 503;

Laws 1997, LB 610, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 86;

Laws 2002, LB 235, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 16;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 391;

Laws 2017, LB91, § 2.
July 1, 2018